California statutes. Public Resources Code
(a) For the initial source reduction and recycling element of a countywide integrated waste management plan which is required to be submitted to the board pursuant to Section 41791, the city waste characterization component shall identify the constituent materials which comprise the solid waste generated within the city. The information shall be representative of the solid waste generated within, and disposed of by, the city and shall reflect seasonal variations. The constituent materials shall be identified by volume, percentage in weight or its volumetric equivalent, material type, and source of generation, which includes residential, commercial, industrial, governmental, or other sources. Future revisions of waste characterization studies shall identify the constituent materials which comprise the solid waste disposed of at permitted disposal facilities.

(b) In adopting or revising regulations implementing subdivision (a), the board shall do all of the following:

(1) Permit the use of studies or data developed on a county or regional basis and adapted to the conditions which exist in a city preparing its waste characterization component.

(2) Permit the use of preexisting data or studies, including those data and studies prepared by local governments with similar waste characteristics.

(3) Require only that amount of seasonal sampling, and waste characterization only of those categories of waste, necessary to achieve the diversion requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 41780.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1292, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

41031.

Any waste characterization component prepared by a city pursuant to Section 41030, and any other information submitted by a city to the board on the quantities of solid waste generated, diverted, and disposed of, shall include data which is as accurate as possible, on the quantities of solid waste generated, diverted, and disposed of, to enable the board, to the maximum extent possible, to accurately measure the diversion requirements established under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 41780.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 145, Sec. 17.   Effective June 19, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

41032.

For the first revision, and any subsequent revision, of a source reduction and recycling element of a countywide integrated waste management plan which is required to be submitted to the board pursuant to Section 41770, the city waste characterization component shall identify the constituent materials which comprise the solid waste disposed of by the city. The information shall be statistically representative of the solid waste disposed of by the city and shall reflect seasonal variations. The constituent materials shall be identified, to the extent practicable, by volume, percentage in weight, or its volumetric equivalent, material type, and source of generation, which includes residential, commercial, industrial, governmental, or other sources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1292, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

41033.

Any waste characterization component prepared by a city pursuant to Section 40132, and any other information submitted by a city to the board on the quantities of solid waste disposed of by the city, shall include data which is as accurate as possible, on the quantities of solid waste generated, diverted, and disposed of, to enable the board, to the maximum extent possible, to accurately measure the diversion requirements of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 41780.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1292, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Source Reduction Component [41050. - 41054.]

41050.

The city source reduction component shall include a program and implementation schedule which shows the methods by which the city will, in combination with the recycling and composting components, reduce a sufficient amount of solid waste disposed of by the city to comply with the diversion requirements of Section 41780.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1292, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

41051.

The city source reduction component shall describe the types of materials which will be reduced under the programs in Section 41050.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

41052.

The city source reduction component shall describe the methods the city will use to determine the categories of solid wastes to be diverted from disposal at a disposal facility through source reduction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1292, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

41053.

The city source reduction component shall describe new facilities, and of expansion of existing facilities, which will be needed to implement the source reduction component.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 145, Sec. 20.   Effective June 19, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

41054.

The city source reduction component shall evaluate and identify rate structures and fees to reduce the amount of wastes that generators produce, and other source reduction strategies, including, but not limited to, programs and economic incentives to reduce the use of nonrecyclable materials, replace disposable materials and products with reusable materials and products, reduce packaging, and increase the efficiency of the use of paper, cardboard, glass, metal, and other materials.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 145, Sec. 21.   Effective June 19, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Recycling Component [41070. - 41075.]

41070.

The city recycling component shall include a program and implementation schedule which shows the methods by which the city will, in combination with the source reduction and composting components, reduce a sufficient amount of solid waste disposed of by the city to comply with the diversion requirements of Section 41780.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1292, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

41071.

The city recycling component shall describe the types of materials which will be recycled under the programs in Section 41070.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

41072.

The city recycling component shall describe the methods the city will use to determine the categories of solid wastes to be diverted from disposal at a disposal facility through recycling.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1292, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

41073.

The city recycling component shall describe new facilities, and of expansion of existing facilities, which will be needed to implement the recycling component.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

41074.

The city recycling component shall describe methods which will be used to increase the markets for recycled materials, including, but not limited to, an evaluation of the feasibility of procurement preferences for the purchase of recycled products. Each city may grant a price preference to encourage the purchase of recycled products. The amount of the price preference shall be determined by the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

41075.

The city recycling component shall evaluate industrial, commercial, residential, governmental, and other curbside, mobile, dropoff, and buy-back recycling programs, manual and automated material recovery facilities, zoning and building code changes which encourage recycling of materials, and rate structures which encourage recycling of materials.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Composting Component [41200. - 41204.]

41200.

The city composting component shall include a program and implementation schedule which shows the methods by which the city will, in combination with the source reduction and recycling components, reduce a sufficient amount of solid waste disposed of by the city to comply with the diversion requirements of Section 41780.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1292, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

41201.

The city composting component shall describe the types of materials which will be composted under the programs in Section 41200.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

41202.

The city composting component shall describe the methods the city will use to determine the categories of solid wastes to be diverted from disposal at a disposal facility through composting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1292, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

41203.

The city composting component shall describe any new facilities, and expansion of existing facilities, which will be needed to implement the composting component.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

41204.

The city composting component shall describe the methods which will be used to increase the markets for composted materials, including, but not limited to, an evaluation of the feasibility of procurement preferences for the purchase of composted products. Each city may grant a price preference to encourage the purchase of composted products. The amount of the price preference shall be determined by the city.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 145, Sec. 22.   Effective June 19, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Education and Public Information Component [41220. - 41220.]

41220.

The city education and public information component shall describe to the board how the city will increase public awareness of, and participation in, recycling, source reduction, and composting programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Funding Component [41230. - 41230.]

41230.

The city funding component shall identify and specifically describe projected costs, revenues, and revenue sources the city will use to implement all components of the city source reduction and recycling element.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 145, Sec. 23.   Effective June 19, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Special Waste Component [41250. - 41250.]

41250.

The city special waste component shall describe existing waste handling and disposal practices for special wastes, including, but not limited to, asbestos and sewage sludge which is not hazardous waste. The component shall identify current and proposed programs to ensure the proper handling, reuse, and long-term disposal of special wastes. The component shall address the disposition of sewage sludge generated in the jurisdiction of the city.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 145, Sec. 24.   Effective June 19, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Facility Capacity Component [41260. - 41260.]

41260.

The city solid waste facility capacity component shall include, but is not limited to, a projection of the amount of disposal capacity which will be needed to accommodate the solid waste generated within the city preparing the element for a 15-year period, reduced by all of the following:

(a) Implementation of source reduction, recycling, and composting programs required by this part or through implementation of other waste diversion programs. 

(b) Any permitted processing, destruction, disposing, or transformation capacity which will be available during the 15-year planning period.

(c) All disposal or transformation capacity which has been secured through an agreement with another city or county or through an agreement with a solid waste enterprise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 145, Sec. 25.   Effective June 19, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. County Source Reduction and Recycling Elements [41300. - 41460.]



  ARTICLE 1. Requirements [41300. - 41303.]

41300.

(a) On or before July 1, 1992, each county shall prepare and adopt for the unincorporated area a county source reduction and recycling element which includes all of the components specified in this chapter and which complies with the requirements specified in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 41780).

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if a county determines that it is unable to comply with the deadline established under subdivision (a) and unable to comply with Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000), to the extent that division requires the preparation and certification of an environmental impact report for the element, the county shall do all of the following:

(1) On or before July 1, 1992, the county shall adopt a resolution stating the reasons it is unable to comply with the deadline established under subdivision (a) and to complete and certify the environmental impact report for the element. The resolution shall also state a date when the county will comply with the deadline established under subdivision (a) and complete and certify the environmental impact report for the element.

(2) On or before July 1, 1992, the county shall submit a copy of the resolution adopted pursuant to paragraph (1) to the board.

(3) Upon completion and certification of the environmental impact report for the source reduction and recycling element, or December 1, 1992, whichever is sooner, the county shall adopt its source reduction and recycling element.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 105, Sec. 2.   Effective June 30, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

41301.

The county source reduction and recycling element shall set forth a program for management of solid waste generated with the unincorporated area of the county, consistent with the waste management hierarchy provided in Section 40051.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

41302.

The county source reduction and recycling element shall place primary emphasis on implementation of all feasible source reduction, recycling, and composting programs while identifying the amount of landfill and transformation capacity that will be needed for solid waste which cannot be reduced at the source, recycled, or composted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

41303.

Each county source reduction and recycling element shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following components for solid waste generated in the jurisdiction of the plan:

(a) A waste characterization component.

(b) A source reduction component.

(c) A recycling component.

(d) A composting component.

(e) A solid waste facility capacity component.

(f) An education and public information component.

(g) A funding component.

(h) A special waste component.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1406, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Waste Characterization Component [41330. - 41333.]

41330.

(a) For the initial source reduction and recycling element of a countywide integrated waste management plan which is required to be submitted to the board pursuant to Section 41791, the county waste characterization component shall identify the constituent materials which comprise the solid waste generated within the unincorporated area of the county. The information shall be representative of the solid waste generated and disposed of within that area and shall reflect seasonal variations. The constituent materials shall be identified by volume, percentage in weight or its volumetric equivalent, material type, and source of generation which includes residential, commercial, industrial, governmental, or other sources. Future revisions of waste characterization studies shall identify the constituent materials which comprise the solid waste disposed of at permitted disposal facilities.

(b) In adopting or revising regulations implementing subdivision (a), the board shall do all of the following:

(1) Permit the use of studies or data developed on a regional basis and adapted to the conditions which exist in a county preparing its waste characterization component.

(2) Permit the use of preexisting data or studies, including those data and studies prepared by local governments with similar waste characteristics.

(3) Require only that amount of seasonal sampling, and waste characterization only of those categories of waste, necessary to achieve the diversion requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 41780.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1292, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

41331.

Any waste characterization component prepared by a county pursuant to Section 41330, and any other information submitted by a county to the board on the quantities of solid waste generated, diverted, and disposed of, shall include data which is as accurate as possible, on the quantities of solid waste generated, diverted, and disposed of, to enable the board, to the maximum extent possible, to accurately measure the diversion requirements established under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 41780.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 145, Sec. 28.   Effective June 19, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

41332.

For the first revision, and any subsequent revision, of a source reduction and recycling element of a countywide integrated waste management plan which is required to be submitted to the board pursuant to Section 41770, the county waste characterization component shall identify the constituent materials which comprise the solid waste disposed of within the unincorporated area of the county. The information shall be statistically representative of the solid waste disposed of within that area and shall reflect seasonal variations. The constituent materials shall, to the extent practicable, be identified by volume, percentage in weight, or its volumetric equivalent, material type, and source of generation, which includes residential, commercial, industrial, governmental, or other sources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1292, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

41333.

Any waste characterization component prepared by a county pursuant to Section 41332, and any other information submitted by a county to the board on the quantities of solid waste disposed of, shall include data which is as accurate as practicable, on the quantities of solid waste generated, diverted, and disposed of, to enable the board, to the maximum extent possible, to accurately measure the diversion requirements of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 41780.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1292, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Source Reduction Component [41350. - 41354.]

41350.

The county source reduction component shall include a program and implementation schedule which shows the methods by which the county will, in combination with the recycling and composting components, reduce a sufficient amount of solid waste disposed of within the unincorporated area of the county to comply with the diversion requirements of Section 41780.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1292, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

41351.

The county source reduction component shall describe the types of materials which will be reduced under the programs in Section 41350.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

41352.

The county source reduction component shall describe the methods that the county will use to determine the categories of solid wastes to be diverted from disposal at a disposal facility through source reduction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1292, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

41353.

The county source reduction component shall describe new facilities, and of expansion of existing facilities, which will be needed to implement the source reduction component.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 145, Sec. 33.   Effective June 19, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

41354.

The county source reduction component shall evaluate and identify rate structures and fees to reduce the amount of wastes that generators produce, and other source reduction strategies, including, but not limited to, programs and economic incentives to reduce the use of nonrecyclable materials, replace disposable materials and products with reusable materials and products, reduce packaging, and increase the efficiency of the use of paper, cardboard, glass, metal, and other materials.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 145, Sec. 34.   Effective June 19, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Recycling Component [41370. - 41375.]

41370.

The county recycling component shall include a program and implementation schedule which shows the methods by which the county will, in combination with the source reduction and composting components, reduce a sufficient amount of solid waste disposed of within the unincorporated area of the county to comply with the diversion requirements of Section 41780.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1292, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

41371.

The county recycling component shall describe the types of materials which will be recycled under the programs in Section 41370.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

41372.

The county recycling component shall describe the methods that the county will use to determine the categories of solid wastes to be diverted from disposal at a disposal facility through recycling.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1292, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

41373.

The county recycling component shall describe new facilities, and expansion of existing facilities, which will be needed to implement the recycling component.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

41374.

The county recycling component shall describe methods which will be used to increase markets for recycled materials, including, but not limited to, an evaluation of the feasibility of procurement preferences for the purchase of recycled products. Each county may grant a price preference to encourage the purchase of recycled products. The amount of the price preference shall be determined by the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

41375.

The county recycling component shall evaluate industrial, commercial, residential, governmental, and other curbside, mobile, dropoff, and buy-back recycling programs, manual and automated material recovery facilities, zoning, and building code changes which encourage recycling of materials, and rate structures which encourage recycling of materials.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Composting Component [41400. - 41404.]

41400.

The county composting component shall include a program and implementation schedule which shows the methods by which the county will, in combination with the source reduction and recycling components, reduce a sufficient amount of solid waste disposed of within the unincorporated area of the county to comply with the diversion requirements of Section 41780.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1292, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

41401.

The county composting component shall describe the types of materials which will be composted under the programs in Section 41400.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

41402.

The county composting component shall describe the methods that the county will use to determine the categories of solid wastes to be diverted from disposal at a disposal facility through composting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1292, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

41403.

The county composting component shall describe new facilities, and expansion of existing facilities, which will be needed to implement the composting component.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

41404.

The county composting component shall describe methods which will be used to increase the markets for composted materials, including, but not limited to, an evaluation of the feasibility of procurement preferences for the purchase of recycled products. Each county may grant a price preference to encourage the purchase of composted products. The amount of the price preference shall be determined by the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Education and Public Information Component [41420. - 41420.]

41420.

The county education and public information component shall describe to the board how the county will educate and inform its citizens about the source reduction, recycling, and composting programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1355, Sec. 17.   Effective September 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Funding Component [41430. - 41430.]

41430.

The county funding component shall identify and specifically describe projected costs, revenues, and revenue sources the county will use to implement all components of the county source reduction and recycling element.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 145, Sec. 39.   Effective June 19, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Special Waste Component [41450. - 41450.]

41450.

The county special waste component shall describe existing waste handling and disposal practices for special wastes, including, but not limited to, asbestos and sewage sludge which is not hazardous waste. The component shall identify current and proposed programs to ensure the proper handling, reuse, and long-term disposal of special wastes. The component shall address the disposition of sewage sludge generated in the jurisdiction of the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 145, Sec. 40.   Effective June 19, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Facility Capacity Component [41460. - 41460.]

41460.

The county solid waste facility capacity component shall include, but is not limitied to, a projection of the amount of disposal capacity which will be needed to accommodate the solid waste generated within the unincorporated area of the county preparing the element for a 15-year period, reduced by all of the following:

(a) Implementation of source reduction, recycling, and composting programs required by this part or through implementation of other waste diversion programs. 

(b) Any permitted disposal or transformation capacity which will be available during the 15-year planning period.

(c) All disposal or transformation capacity which has been secured through an agreement with another city, county, or through an agreement with a solid waste enterprise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.5. Household Hazardous Waste Elements [41500. - 41516.]



  ARTICLE 1. City Household Hazardous Waste Elements [41500. - 41502.]

41500.

(a) On or before July 1, 1992, each city shall prepare, adopt, and submit to the county in which the city is located a household hazardous waste element which identifies a program for the safe collection, recycling, treatment, and disposal of hazardous wastes, as defined in Section 25117 of the Health and Safety Code, which are generated by households in the city and which should be separated from the solid waste stream.

In preparing a city household hazardous waste element pursuant to this section, a city may use components of a city hazardous waste plan prepared pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 25135.7 of the Health and Safety Code if the city hazardous waste plan meets the requirements of this article and Section 41802.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if a city determines that it is unable to comply with the deadline established under subdivision (a) and unable to comply with Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000), to the extent that division requires the preparation and certification of an environmental impact report for the element, the city shall do all of the following:

(1) On or before July 1, 1992, the city shall adopt a resolution stating the reasons it is unable to comply with the deadline established under subdivision (a) and to complete and certify the environmental impact report for the household hazardous waste element. The resolution shall also state a date when the city will comply with the deadline established under subdivision (a) and complete and certify the environmental impact report for the household hazardous waste element.

(2) On or before July 1, 1992, the city shall submit its draft household hazardous waste element and a copy of the resolution adopted pursuant to paragraph (1) to the county within which the city is located.

(3) Upon completion and certification of the environmental impact report for the household hazardous waste element, or December 1, 1992, whichever is sooner, the city shall submit its final household hazardous waste element to the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 105, Sec. 3.   Effective June 30, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

41502.

A city household hazardous waste element may include a program for the safe collection, treatment, and disposal of sharps waste generated by households. The program may include any of the following:

(a) The designation of authorized collection locations, including, but not limited to, household hazardous waste collection facilities, designated hospitals and clinics, and fire stations.

(b) Efforts to inform and encourage the public to return sharps waste to designated collection locations.

(c) Efforts to inform and encourage the public to subscribe to mail-back programs authorized by the United States Postal Service.

(d) An estimate of the expenditures required for the safe collection, treatment, and disposal of sharps waste, and consideration of the feasibility of offering low-cost mail-back programs for senior and low-income households.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 157, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. County Household Hazardous Waste Elements [41510. - 41512.]

41510.

(a) On or before July 1, 1992, each county shall prepare a household hazardous waste element which identifies a program for the safe collection, recycling, treatment, and disposal of hazardous wastes, as defined in Section 25117 of the Health and Safety Code, which are generated by households in the unincorporated area of the county and which should be separated from the solid waste stream. In preparing a county household hazardous waste element pursuant to this section, a county may use components of a county hazardous waste management plan prepared pursuant to Section 25135.1 of the Health and Safety Code, if that plan meets the requirements of this article and of Section 41802.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if a county determines that it is unable to comply with the deadline established under subdivision (a) and unable to comply with Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000), to the extent that division requires the preparation and certification of an environmental impact report for the element, the county shall do all of the following:

(1) On or before July 1, 1992, the county shall adopt a resolution stating the reasons it is unable to comply with the deadline established under subdivision (a) and to complete and certify the environmental impact report for the household hazardous waste element. The resolution shall also state a date when the county will comply with the deadline established under subdivision (a) and complete and certify the environmental impact report for the household hazardous waste element.

(2) On or before July 1, 1992, the county shall submit its draft household hazardous waste element and a copy of the resolution adopted pursuant to paragraph (1) to the board.

(3) Upon completion and certification of the environmental impact report for the household hazardous waste element, or December 1, 1992, whichever is sooner, the county shall adopt its household hazardous waste element.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 105, Sec. 4.   Effective June 30, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

41512.

A county household hazardous waste element may include a program for the safe collection, treatment, and disposal of sharps waste generated by households. The program may include any of the following:

(a) The designation of authorized collection locations, including, but not limited to, household hazardous waste collection facilities, designated hospitals and clinics, and fire stations.

(b) Efforts to inform and encourage the public to return sharps waste to designated collection locations.

(c) Efforts to inform and encourage the public to subscribe to mail-back programs authorized by the United States Postal Service.

(d) An estimate of the expenditures required for the safe collection, treatment, and disposal of sharps waste, and consideration of the feasibility of offering low-cost mail-back programs for senior and low-income households.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 157, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Educational Information [41515. - 41515.]

41515.

If a city, county, or regional agency conducts an aerosol can recycling program, a requirement to educate the public on the safe collection and recycling or disposal of aerosol cans shall be incorporated into the household hazardous waste element prepared by the city, county, or regional agency when that element is revised.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 424, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Covered Electronic Waste [41516. - 41516.]

41516.

(a) For purposes of this article, “covered electronic waste” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 42463.

(b) On and after January 1, 2004, when a county or regional agency revises the countywide or regional integrated waste management plan and its elements pursuant to Section 41770, the city household hazardous waste element and county household hazardous waste element in the plan shall identify those actions the city, county, or regional agency is taking to promote the collection, consolidation, recovery, and recycling of covered electronic waste.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 370, Sec. 3.   (SB 1215)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Countywide Siting Elements [41700. - 41721.5.]



  ARTICLE 1. Element Preparation [41700. - 41704.]

41700.

Each county shall prepare a countywide siting element that provides a description of the areas to be used for development of adequate transformation, EMSW conversion, or disposal capacity concurrent and consistent with the development and implementation of the county and city source reduction and recycling elements adopted pursuant to this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 411, Sec. 8.   (AB 1126)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

41701.

Each countywide siting element and revision thereto shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(a) A statement of goals and policies for the environmentally safe transformation or disposal of solid waste that cannot be reduced, recycled, or composted.

(b) An estimate of the total transformation or disposal capacity in cubic yards that will be needed for a 15-year period to safely handle solid wastes generated with the county that cannot be reduced, recycled, or composted.

(c) The remaining combined capacity of existing solid waste transformation or disposal facilities existing at the time of the preparation of the siting element, or revision thereto, in cubic yards and years.

(d) The identification of an area or areas for the location of new solid waste transformation or disposal facilities, or the expansion of existing facilities, that are consistent with the applicable city or county general plan, if the county determines that existing capacity will be exhausted within 15 years or additional capacity is desired.

(e) For countywide elements submitted or revised on or after January 1, 2003, a description of the actions taken by the city or county to solicit public participation by the affected communities, including, but not limited to, minority and low-income populations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1003, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

41702.

An area is consistent with the city or county general plan if all of the following requirements are met:

(a) The city or county adopted a general plan which complies with the requirements of Article 5 (commencing with Section 65300) of Chapter 3 of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code.

(b) The area reserved for a new solid waste facility or the expansion of an existing solid waste facility is located in, or coextensive with, a land use area designated or authorized for solid waste facilities in the applicable city or county general plan.

(c) The land use authorized in the applicable city or county general plan adjacent to or near the area reserved for the establishment of new solid waste transformation or disposal of solid waste or expansion of existing facilities is compatible with the establishment or expansion of the solid waste facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

41703.

If the county determines that existing capacity will be exhausted within 15 years or additional capacity is desired and that there is no area available for the location of a new solid waste transformation or disposal facility or the expansion of an existing solid waste transformation or disposal facility which is consistent with any applicable city or county general plan, the siting element shall include a specific strategy for the transformation or disposal of solid waste in excess of remaining capacity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

41704.

Except as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 41710, any area or areas identified for the location of a new solid waste transformation or disposal facility shall be located in, coextensive with, or adjacent to, a land use area authorized for a solid waste transformation or disposal facility in the applicable city or county general plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)